MichifVerbs.lexc
LEXICON VTAPersonMarking

!! First Person Subject Independent Order Direct
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@[1SG][DIR][3SG-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@w EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@[1SG][DIR][3PL-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@waak EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@[1PL][DIR][3SG-OBJ][EXCL]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@nan EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@[1PL][DIR][3PL-OBJ][EXCL]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@naanik EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@[1PL][DIR][3SG-OBJ][INCL]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@naan EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@[1PL][DIR][3PL-OBJ][INCL]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@naanik EndVerb ;

!! Independent Order Inverse
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.ikw@[3SG][INV][1SG-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.ikw@ EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.ikw@[3PL][INV][1SG-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.ikw@aak EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.ikw@[3SG][INV][1PL-OBJ][EXCL]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@naan EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.ikw@[3PL][INV][1PL-OBJ][EXCL]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@naanik EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@[3SG][INV][1PL-OBJ][INCL]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.ikw@naan EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@[3PL][INV][1PL-OBJ][INCL]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.ikw@naanik EndVerb ;

!! First Person Subject Conjunct Order Direct
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@[1SG][DIR][3SG-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@k EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@[1SG][DIR][3PL-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@kik EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@[1PL][DIR][3SG-OBJ][EXCL]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@yaahk EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@[1PL][DIR][3PL-OBJ][EXCL]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.aa@yaahkwik EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@[1PL][DIR][3SG-OBJ][INCL]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@yaahk EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@[1PL][DIR][3PL-OBJ][INCL]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@yaahkwik EndVerb ;

!! Conjunct Order Inverse
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.i@[3SG][INV][1SG-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.i@t EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.i@[3PL][INV][1SG-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.i@tik EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.ikw@[3SG][INV][1PL-OBJ][EXCL]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.ikw@aahk EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.ikw@[3PL][INV][1PL-OBJ][EXCL]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ni@@R.direction.ikw@aahkwik EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@[3SG][INV][1PL-OBJ][INCL]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@aahk EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@[3PL][INV][1PL-OBJ][INCL]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@aahkwik EndVerb ;


!! Second Person Subject Independent Order Direct
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@[2SG][DIR][1SG-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@n EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@[2SG][DIR][1PL-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@naan EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@[2SG][DIR][3SG-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@w EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@[2SG][DIR][3PL-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@waak EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@[2PL][DIR][1-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@naawaaw EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@[2PL][DIR][3SG-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@waaw EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@[2PL][DIR][3PL-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@waawaak EndVerb ;

!! Independent Order Inverse
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.iti@[1SG][INV][2SG-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.it@in EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.iti@[1PL][INV][2SG-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.it@inaan EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@[3SG][INV][2SG-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@w EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@[3PL][INV][2SG-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@iwaak EndVerb ;
!! TODO: What's [1]? Is it supposed to be [1PL]?
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.iti@[1][INV][2PL-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.it@inawaaw EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@[3SG][INV][2PL-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@waaw EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@[3PL][INV][2PL-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@waawaak EndVerb ;

!! Second Person Subject Conjunct Order Direct

@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@[2SG][DIR][1SG-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@yen EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@[2SG][DIR][1PL-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@yaahk EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@[2SG][DIR][3SG-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@t EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@[2SG][DIR][3PL-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@tik EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@[2PL][DIR][3SG-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@yehk EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@[2PL][DIR][3PL-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.aa@yehkwik EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@[2PL][DIR][1SG-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@yehk EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@[2PL][DIR][1PL-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@yaahk EndVerb ;

!! Conjunt Order inverse
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.it@[1SG][INV][2SG-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.it@aan EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.it@[1PL][INV][2SG-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.it@aahk EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@[3SG][INV][2SG-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@shk EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@[3PL][INV][2SG-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.i@shkik EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@[3SG][INV][2PL-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@ehk EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@[3PL][INV][2PL-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.ikw@ehkwik EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.it@[1SG][INV][2PL-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.it@ehk EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.it@[1PL][INV][2PL-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@R.person.ki@@R.direction.it@aahk EndVerb ;


!! Third Person Subject Independent Order Direct
@R.order.indep@@D.person@@R.direction.ee@[3SG][DIR][3-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@D.person@@R.direction.ee@w VTAObviative ;
@R.order.indep@@D.person@@R.direction.ee@[3PL][DIR][3-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@D.person@@R.direction.ee@waak VTAObviative ;

!! Independent Order Inverse
@R.order.indep@@D.person@@R.direction.i@[3SG][INV][3-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@D.person@@R.direction.i@k VTAObviative ;
@R.order.indep@@D.person@@R.direction.i@[3PL][INV][3-OBJ]:@R.order.indep@@D.person@@R.direction.i@waak VTAObviative ;

!! Third Person Subject Conjunct Order Direct
@R.order.conj@@D.person@@R.direction.aa@[3-SUBJ][DIR][3-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@D.person@@R.direction.aa@t EndVerb ;
@R.order.conj@@D.person@@R.direction.aa@[3-SUBJ][DIR][3-OBJ]:@R.order.conj@@D.person@@R.direction.aa@tik EndVerb ;

LEXICON VAIObviative1
@D.obv@                EndVerb ; !! Not obviative, don't care
@R.obv@[OBV]:@R.obv@   VAIObviative2 ;

LEXICON VAIObviative2 !! Here, the word is DEFINITELY obviative!
@D.order.indep@:@D.order.indep@     EndVerb ;
@R.order.indep@:@R.order.indep@%<a  EndVerb ;

LEXICON VTAObviative

@R.obv@[OBV]:@R.obv@ EndVerb ;

LEXICON EndVerb
0 # ;
